District of Columbia statutes.
7-2081.02

Expedited partner therapy.

(a)

(1)

A health care practitioner who diagnoses a chlamydia, gonorrhea or trichomoniasis infection in a patient may prescribe and dispense antimicrobial drugs to the patient’s sexual partner for treatment of that STI without an examination of the sexual partner.

(2)

The Director of DOH may add to the STIs covered under this chapter by rulemaking.

(b)

(1)

A health care practitioner providing EPT shall designate, in writing, on the prescription form:

(A)

The phrase “EPT” above the name of the medication and dosage for all prescriptions issued; and

(B)

The name, address, and date of birth of the sexual partner, if available.

(2)

If the name, address, and date of birth of the sexual partner are not available, the written designation “EPT” shall be sufficient for the pharmacist to fill the prescription.

(3)

The health care practitioner shall report to DOH the number of prescribed EPT prescriptions issued, in addition to existing STI reporting requirements.

(c)

A health care practitioner that provides a patient with antimicrobial drugs or a prescription in accordance with this chapter shall give the patient informational materials for the patient to give to his or her sexual partner. The health care practitioner shall counsel the patient to inform his or her sexual partner of the importance of reading the information contained in the materials before the sexual partner takes the medication. The materials shall:

(1)

Encourage the sexual partner to consult a health care practitioner for a complete STI evaluation as a preferred alternative to EPT;

(2)

Disclose the risk of potentially adverse drug reactions, including allergic reactions, that the antimicrobial drugs could produce and the possibility of dangerous interactions between the antimicrobial drugs and other medications that the sexual partner may be taking;

(3)

Inform the sexual partner that he or she may be affected by other STIs that may be left untreated by the delivered antimicrobial drugs;

(4)

Inform the sexual partner that if symptoms of a more serious infection are present (such as abdominal, pelvic, or testicular pain, fever, nausea, or vomiting) he or she should seek medical care as soon as possible;

(5)

Recommend that a sexual partner who is or could be pregnant should consult a health care practitioner as soon as possible;

(6)

Instruct the sexual partner to abstain from sexual activity for at least 7 days after treatment to decrease the risk of recurrent infection;

(7)

Inform a sexual partner who is at high risk of co-morbidity with HIV infection that he or she should consult a health care practitioner for a complete medical evaluation, including testing for HIV and other STIs; and

(8)

Inform the sexual partner how to prevent repeated chlamydia, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis infections.

Apr. 30, 2014, D.C. Law 20-97, § 3, 61 DCR 1589

History